dict/pt_BR.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX q   r       ste-lhe        elir
SFX q   r       ste-lhes       elir
SFX q   r       ste-me         elir
SFX q   r       ste-nos        elir
SFX q   r       ste-o          elir
SFX q   r       ste-os         elir
SFX q   r       ste-se         elir
SFX q   r       ste-te         elir
SFX q   r       ste-vos        elir
SFX q   r       u-a            elir
SFX q   r       u-as           elir
SFX q   r       u-lhe          elir
SFX q   r       u-lhes         elir
SFX q   r       u-me           elir
SFX q   r       u-nos          elir
SFX q   r       u-o            elir
SFX q   r       u-os           elir
SFX q   r       u-se           elir
SFX q   r       u-te           elir
SFX q   r       u-vos          elir
SFX q   elir    ila-a          elir
SFX q   elir    ila-as         elir
SFX q   elir    ila-lhe        elir
SFX q   elir    ila-lhes       elir
SFX q   elir    ila-me         elir
SFX q   elir    ila-nos        elir
SFX q   elir    ila-o          elir
SFX q   elir    ila-os         elir
SFX q   elir    ila-se         elir
SFX q   elir    ila-te         elir
SFX q   elir    ila-vos        elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-lhe       elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-lhes      elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-me        elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-na        elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-nas       elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-no        elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-nos       elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-se        elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-te        elir
SFX q   elir    ilam-vos       elir
SFX q   elir    ilamo-nos      elir
SFX q   elir    ilamo-vos      elir
SFX q   elir    ilamos-lhe     elir
SFX q   elir    ilamos-lhes    elir
SFX q   elir    ilamos-te      elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-a          elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-as         elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-lhe        elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-lhes       elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-me         elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-o          elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-os         elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-te         elir
SFX q   elir    ilo-vos        elir
SFX q   ir      a-a            uir
SFX q   ir      a-as           uir
SFX q   ir      a-lhe          uir
SFX q   ir      a-lhes         uir
SFX q   ir      a-me           uir
SFX q   ir      a-nos          uir
SFX q   ir      a-o            uir
SFX q   ir      a-os           uir
SFX q   ir      a-se           uir
SFX q   ir      a-te           uir
SFX q   ir      a-vos          uir
SFX q   ir      am-lhe         uir
SFX q   ir      am-lhes        uir
SFX q   ir      am-me          uir
SFX q   ir      am-na          uir
SFX q   ir      am-nas         uir
SFX q   ir      am-no          uir
SFX q   ir      am-nos         uir
SFX q   ir      am-se          uir
SFX q   ir      am-te          uir
SFX q   ir      am-vos         uir
SFX q   ir      amo-nos        uir
SFX q   ir      amo-vos        uir
SFX q   ir      amos-lhe       uir
SFX q   ir      amos-lhes      uir
SFX q   ir      amos-te        uir
SFX q   ir      em-lhe         uir
SFX q   ir      em-lhes        uir
SFX q   ir      em-me          uir
SFX q   ir      em-na          uir
SFX q   ir      em-nas         uir
SFX q   ir      em-no          uir
SFX q   ir      em-nos         uir
SFX q   ir      em-se          uir
SFX q   ir      em-te          uir
SFX q   ir      em-vos         uir
SFX q   r       -a             uir
SFX q   r       -as            uir
SFX q   r       -lhe           uir
SFX q   r       -lhes          uir
SFX q   r       -me            uir
SFX q   r       -nos           uir
SFX q   r       -o             uir
SFX q   r       -os            uir
SFX q   r       -se            uir
SFX q   r       -te            uir
SFX q   r       -vos           uir
SFX q   ir      í-la           uir
SFX q   ir      í-la-á         uir
SFX q   ir      í-la-ás        uir
SFX q   ir      í-la-ei        uir
SFX q   ir      í-la-ia        uir
SFX q   ir      í-la-iam       uir
SFX q   ir      í-las          uir
SFX q   ir      í-las-á        uir
SFX q   ir      í-las-ás       uir
SFX q   ir      í-las-ei       uir
SFX q   ir      í-las-ia       uir
SFX q   ir      í-las-iam      uir
SFX q   ir      í-lhe          uir
SFX q   ir      í-lhes         uir
SFX q   ir      í-lo           uir
SFX q   ir      í-lo-á         uir
SFX q   ir      í-lo-ás        uir
SFX q   ir      í-lo-ei        uir
SFX q   ir      í-lo-ia        uir
SFX q   ir      í-lo-iam       uir
SFX q   ir      í-los          uir
SFX q   ir      í-los-á        uir
SFX q   ir      í-los-ás       uir
SFX q   ir      í-los-ei       uir
SFX q   ir      í-los-ia       uir
SFX q   ir      í-los-iam      uir
SFX q   ir      í-me           uir
SFX q   ir      í-nos          uir
SFX q   ir      í-te           uir
SFX q   ir      í-vos          uir
SFX q   r       a-a            uir
SFX q   r       a-as           uir
SFX q   r       a-lhe          uir
SFX q   r       a-lhes         uir
SFX q   r       a-me           uir
SFX q   r       a-nos          uir
SFX q   r       a-o            uir
SFX q   r       a-os           uir
SFX q   r       a-se           uir
SFX q   r       a-te           uir
SFX q   r       a-vos          uir
SFX q   ir      ía-a           uir
SFX q   ir      ía-as          uir
SFX q   ir      ía-lhe         uir
SFX q   ir      ía-lhes        uir
SFX q   ir      ía-me          uir
SFX q   ir      ía-nos         uir
SFX q   ir      ía-o           uir
SFX q   ir      ía-os          uir
SFX q   ir      ía-se          uir
SFX q   ir      ía-te          uir
SFX q   ir      ía-vos         uir
SFX q   r       am-lhe         uir
SFX q   r       am-lhes        uir
SFX q   r       am-me          uir
SFX q   r       am-na          uir
SFX q   r       am-nas         uir
SFX q   r       am-no          uir
SFX q   r       am-nos         uir
SFX q   r       am-se          uir
SFX q   r       am-te          uir
SFX q   r       am-vos         uir
SFX q   ir      íamo-nos       uir
SFX q   ir      íamo-vos       uir
SFX q   ir      íamos-lhe      uir
SFX q   ir      íamos-lhes     uir
SFX q   ir      íamos-te       uir
SFX q   r       do-a           uir
SFX q   r       do-as          uir
SFX q   r       do-lhe         uir
SFX q   r       do-lhes        uir
SFX q   r       do-me          uir
SFX q   r       do-nos         uir
SFX q   r       do-o           uir
SFX q   r       do-os          uir
SFX q   r       do-se          uir
SFX q   r       do-te          uir
SFX q   r       do-vos         uir
SFX q   r       mo-nos         uir
SFX q   r       mo-vos         uir
SFX q   r       mos-lhe        uir
SFX q   r       mos-lhes       uir
SFX q   r       mos-te         uir
SFX q   r       ndo-a          uir
SFX q   r       ndo-as         uir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhe        uir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhes       uir
SFX q   r       ndo-me         uir
SFX q   r       ndo-nos        uir
SFX q   r       ndo-o          uir
SFX q   r       ndo-os         uir
SFX q   r       ndo-se         uir
SFX q   r       ndo-te         uir
SFX q   r       ndo-vos        uir
SFX q   0       a-a            uir
SFX q   0       a-as           uir
SFX q   0       a-lhe          uir
SFX q   0       a-lhes         uir
SFX q   0       a-me           uir
SFX q   0       a-nos          uir
SFX q   0       a-o            uir
SFX q   0       a-os           uir
SFX q   0       a-se           uir
SFX q   0       a-te           uir
SFX q   0       a-vos          uir
SFX q   0       -la-á          uir
SFX q   0       -las-á         uir
SFX q   0       -lhe-á         uir
SFX q   0       -lhes-á        uir
SFX q   0       -lo-á          uir
SFX q   0       -los-á         uir
SFX q   0       -me-á          uir
SFX q   0       -nos-á         uir
SFX q   0       -se-á          uir
SFX q   0       -te-á          uir
SFX q   0       -vos-á         uir
SFX q   ir      íra-a          uir
SFX q   ir      íra-as         uir
SFX q   ir      íra-lhe        uir
SFX q   ir      íra-lhes       uir
SFX q   ir      íra-me         uir
SFX q   ir      íra-nos        uir
SFX q   ir      íra-o          uir
SFX q   ir      íra-os         uir
SFX q   ir      íra-se         uir
