dict/pt_BR.dic
abolir/gjMq
amarelir/gjLMq
arguir/gjq
compelir/gjLMq
convelir/gjLMq
delir/gjLMq
demolir/gjMqÀÃ
emolir/gjMq
excelir/gjLMq
expelir/gjLMq
impelir/gjLMq
prevenir/gjMqÂ
propelir/gjLMqÃ
prover/bgjMqÀÂ
redarguir/gjq
repelir/gjLMq
revelir/gjLMq
tossir/gjMq
